Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 1
G

ENERAL PROVISIONS

Cross references.

- Authority of board of regents to establish and operate marine resources extension centers and an institute for oceanographic studies, T. 20, C. 12.

Duties of Department of Industry, Trade, and Tourism to promote marine research and industrial activities,

§

50-7-30

.

12-5-210. Development and utilization of coastal and offshore waters, lands, and resources; delegation of powers and duties; power to make contracts.

The department shall study and develop plans, proposals, reports, and recommendations for the development and utilization of the coastal and offshore lands, waters, and resources of this state.

The department may delegate to its officers, agents, and employees such powers and duties as it may deem proper to carry out the purposes of this part.

The department may contract with any department, board, or agency of the state, local, or federal government; the University System of Georgia or any of its component units; other public or private colleges and universities; nonprofit organizations; foundations; corporations; private business firms; and individuals, as shall be consonant with all the purposes of this part.

(Ga. L. 1967, p. 12, §§ 1, 4; Ga. L. 1969, p. 754, § 1.)

12-5-211. Receipt of financial and other assistance; plans and proposals for development and utilization of coastal and offshore resources; coordination between state agencies; reporting.

The department shall have the power:

To receive, for the purposes expressed in this part, funds, facilities, land, or other support, in any form, such as grants, allocations, gifts, exchanges, or rentals, from local, state, and federal governments; from nonprofit organizations and foundations; and from business firms and individuals;

To study and develop plans, proposals, reports, and recommendations for the development and utilization of the coastal and offshore lands and waters and other coastal and offshore resources of this state for the purpose of determining those uses which will produce the most beneficial economic, industrial, recreational, and aesthetic results; and to publish in print or electronically and make available reports or information in connection with such studies;

To coordinate plans between state agencies when such agencies have a common interest in matters affecting utilization or development of coastal or offshore lands, waters, and other resources; and

To prepare and furnish studies, reports, plans, and recommendations to any state agency, department, or commission requesting them in connection with development or utilization of coastal or offshore lands, waters, and other resources.

(Ga. L. 1967, p. 12, § 4; Ga. L. 1969, p. 754, § 3; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.)

12-5-212. Annual report.

The department shall make an annual report to the General Assembly which shall include a report on all funds and properties received or disbursed under this part.
The department shall not be required to distribute copies of the annual report to the members of the General Assembly but shall notify the members of the availability of the annual report in the manner which it deems to be most effective and efficient.

(Ga. L. 1967, p. 12, § 10; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 5/SB 49.)

12-5-213. Liberal construction of part.

This part, being for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof.

(Ga. L. 1967, p. 12, § 11.)